Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1406
Nebraska Police
Standards Advisory Council; created; purpose and duties; meetings.

There is hereby created the Nebraska Police Standards Advisory
Council. The council shall be a special standing committee of the commission
with the express purpose of overseeing all training schools and training academies
and the operation of the training center and ensuring that all rules, regulations,
and policies with respect to pre-certification, certification, continuing
education, and training requirements are implemented and complied with. The council shall act for
the commission in all matters relating to law enforcement training, the training center, and continuing education but shall not have
any other powers and duties with respect to the commission or any of its duties.
The council shall conduct regular meetings in order to carry out its statutory
duties.

Laws 1969, c. 773, § 6, p. 2927;

Laws 1994, LB 971, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 994, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB817, § 8.

It is the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice, not the Nebraska Police Standards Advisory Council, which is charged with the promulgation, adoption, and filing with the Secretary of State of rules and regulations. Hauser v. Nebraska Police Stds. Adv. Council, 264 Neb. 605, 650 N.W.2d 760 (2002).